Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5968XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2066 Section 1. Section 279.50, subsections 4 and 6, Code 2026, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 4. Each school board shall annually provide to a parent 3 or guardian of any pupil enrolled in the school district , 4 information all of the following: 5 a. Information about the human growth and development 6 curriculum used in the pupilâs grade level and the . 7 b. The procedure for inspecting the human growth and 8 development course instructional materials prior to their use 9 in the classroom. 10 c. Information about human growth and development that may 11 be provided to pupils at an educational conference or seminar 12 for which the school district facilitates pupil attendance. 13 d. Information regarding the requirements for consent 14 described in subsection 6. 15 6. A school district shall not enroll a pupil shall not be 16 required to take in a course of instruction in human growth 17 and development if or facilitate a pupilâs attendance at an 18 educational conference or seminar that provides information 19 about human growth and development unless the pupilâs parent or 20 guardian files with the appropriate principal a written request 21 that the pupil be excused from the instruction informed consent 22 acknowledging receipt of the information required in subsection 23 4 . Notification that the written request may be made shall be 24 included in the information provided by the school district. 25 Sec. 2. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 26 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 27 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 28 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 29 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 30 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 31 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 32 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 33 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 34 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 35 -1- LSB 5968XS (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 2066 districts. 1